en: Cheese ravioli, Ravioli with cheese
de: Käseravioli, Käse-Ravioli
es: Ravioli de queso
fi: juustoravioli
fr: Ravioli au fromage, Raviolis au fromage, Ravioli aux fromages, Raviolis aux fromages, Raviolis fromages
hr: Ravioli sa sirom
hu: Sajtos ravioli, Ravioli sajttal
it: Ravioli al formaggio
nl: Kaasraviolis

en: Fresh pasta stuffed with cheese
de: Frische Pasta mit Käse gefüllt
es: Pasta fresca rellena de queso
fr: Pâtes fraîches au fromage
hr: Svježa tjestenina punjena sirom
it: Pasta fresca ripiena di formaggio
nl: Verse pasta gevuld met kaas
ru: Свежая паста с начинкой из сыра

en: Pasta stuffed with meat
de: Nudeln mit Fleischfüllung
es: Pasta rellena de carne
fr: Pâtes farcies à la viande
hr: Tjestenina punjena mesom
it: tortellini o ravioli alla carne
nl: Pasta gevuld met vlees
ru: Мясные пельмени

en: Fresh ravioli
bg: Пресни равиоли
de: Frische Ravioli
fr: Ravioli frais
hr: Svježi ravioli
nl: Verse raviolis

en: Fresh meat ravioli
fr: Ravioli frais à la viande

en: Meat ravioli
bg: Равиоли с месо
de: Fleischravioli
es: Ravioli de carne
fr: Ravioli à la viande
hr: Mesni ravioli
it: Ravioli di carne
nl: Vleesravioli

en: Frozen manti
fr: Manti surgelés

en: Pelmeni
xx: Pelmeni
ru: пельмени

en: Frozen pelmeni
fr: Pelmeni surgelés

en: Ravioli with vegetables, Vegetable ravioli, Ravioli filled with vegetables
bg: Равиоли със зеленчуци
de: Gemüseravioli, Gemüse-Ravioli
es: Ravioli con verduras, Ravioles con verduras, Ravioli de verduras, Raviolis de verduras
fi: Raviolia kasviksilla
fr: Raviolis aux légumes, Ravioli aux légumes, Raviolis légumes, Ravioli légumes
hr: Ravioli s povrćem
hu: Zöldséges ravioli, Ravioli zöldséggel
it: Ravioli con ripieno vegetale
nl: Groenteraviolis

fr: Ravioli à la volaille, Raviolis volaille, raviolis à la volaille, raviolis au poulet
de: Geflügelravioli, Geflügel-Ravioli
nl: Gevogelteraviolis

en: Beef ravioli
de: Rindfleischravioli, Rindfleisch-Ravioli
es: Ravioli de ternera
fi: naudanliharavioli
fr: Raviolis au bœuf, Ravioli pur bœuf
hr: Goveđi ravioli
hu: Marha ravioli
it: Ravioli di manzo, Ravioli con ripieno di manzo, Ravioli con ripieno di carne di manzo
nl: Rundvleesraviolis

en: Fresh pasta stuffed with meat
fr: Pâtes fraîches farcies à la viande

en: Cooked fresh pasta stuffed with meat
fr: Pâtes fraîches cuites farcies à la viande

en: Ham Ravioli, Raviolis with ham
bg: Равиоли с шунка
de: Schinkenravioli
es: Ravioli de jamón
fi: Kinkkuravioli
fr: Ravioli au jambon, Raviolis au jambon
hr: Ravioli sa šunkom
hu: Sonkás ravioli, Ravioli sonkával
it: Ravioli al prosciutto
nl: Ravioli met ham

en: Bolognese Raviolis, Ravioli with Bolognese
de: Ravioli Bolognese
fi: Bolognese raviolit
fr: Ravioli à la bolognaise, raviolis à la bolognaise, Ravioli bolognaise, Raviolis bolognaise
hr: Bolognese ravioli
hu: Bolognais ravioli, Ravioli bolognaival
nl: Bolognese Raviolis

en: Fresh pasta stuffed with cheese and vegetables
fr: Pâtes fraîches farcies au fromage et aux légumes

en: Cooked fresh pasta stuffed with cheese and vegetables
fr: Pâtes fraîches cuits farcies au fromage et aux légumes

en: Pasta stuffed with vegetables
de: Gemüse gefüllte Pasta
es: Pasta rellena de verduras
fr: Pates farcies aux légumes
hr: Tjestenina punjena povrćem
it: Pasta ripiena di verdure
nl: Pasta gevuld met groenten

en: Fresh pasta stuffed with vegetables
de: Frische Pasta gefüllt mit Gemüse
es: Pasta fresca rellena de verduras
fr: Pâtes fraîches farcies aux légumes
hr: Svježa tjestenina punjena povrćem
it: Pasta fresca ripiena di verdure
nl: Verse pasta gevuld met groenten